Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2201
Short title.

Sections 30-401 to 30-406, 30-701 to 30-713, 30-2201 to 30-2902, 30-3901 to 30-3923, 30-4001 to 30-4045, 30-4201 to 30-4210 and the Public Guardianship Act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Probate Code.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 1, UPC § 1-101;

Laws 1985, LB 292, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 33;

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 466, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 100, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB758, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB157, § 28;

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 46;

Laws 2014, LB788, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB920, § 19;

Laws 2014, LB998, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB43, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB422, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB934, § 13;

Laws 2018, LB845, § 15;

Laws 2020, LB966, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB985, § 1.
July 18, 2026
Public Guardianship Act, see section 30-4101.

Appeals of matters arising under the Nebraska Probate Code are reviewed for error on the record. In re Guardianship of Brenda B. et al., 13 Neb. App. 618, 698 N.W.2d 228 (2005).